Hawaii, session 2026, HB793.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 29-14, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§29-14  Boards, etc., may accept funds, comply with federal acts.  (a)  Except as otherwise provided by law, any board, commission, department, or officer of the State may accept and receive on behalf of the State, and receipt for, any and all grants or allotments of federal-aid moneys made available to the State by or pursuant to an act of Congress, and enter into or make such plan, agreement, or other arrangement with the agency designated by the act of Congress as is necessary to carry out the purposes of the Act; provided that [if]: (1)  If as a condition to receiving the federal-aid moneys it is necessary to match all or any part of the grant or allotment with state moneys no plan, agreement, or arrangement may be entered into unless the board, commission, department, or officer has under its or the officer's control moneys [which] that may be expended lawfully for the purpose[.]; and (2)  The board, commission, department, or officer of the State shall notify the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives in writing of the receipt of any grant or allotment of federal-aid moneys no later than ten days following receipt. (b)  The governor may transfer funds from the department of health to the department of human services and from the department of human services to the department of labor and industrial relations to obtain additional federal funds for medical assistance under Title XIX of the Social Security Act, as amended, and the work incentive program.  The governor may also transfer funds from one department to another for the purpose of obtaining federal matching grants and allotments; provided that the state moneys have been appropriated for the purpose for which federal grants and allotments may be obtained." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________